Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 9. Benefits.
§ 51.1-155.2.
Exceptions from general early retirement provisions for certain local government officials.

The provisions of this section apply to any member of the retirement system who (i) is appointed county administrator pursuant to §

15.2-406

or

15.2-1540

, urban county executive pursuant to §

15.2-804

, county executive pursuant to §

15.2-509

, county manager pursuant to §

15.2-609

or

15.2-702

, county administrator or city or town manager pursuant to Chapter 15 (§

15.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 15.2 or county, city or town attorney pursuant to §

15.2-1542

; (ii) is involuntarily separated from service; and (iii) has 20 or more years of creditable service at the date of separation. Such member may retire without the reduction in retirement allowance required by subdivisions A 2 and A 3 of §

51.1-155

upon attaining age 50, provided, however, that if (a) the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, (b) the member does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, or (c) the member is enrolled in the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, then the member may retire without the reduction in retirement allowance required by subdivisions A 2 and A 3 of §

51.1-155

upon attaining age 60.

For the purposes of this section, “involuntary separation” means any dismissal, requested resignation, or failure to obtain reappointment, except in case of a conviction for a felony or crime involving moral turpitude or dishonesty.

The cost of this provision shall be borne by the locality.

History.

1995, c. 721; 1996, cc. 662, 924; 1998, c. 676; 2000, cc. 343, 911; 2008, c. 537; 2011, c. 880; 2014, c. 356.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 662 and 924, cl. 2 provides: “[t]hat the provisions of this act amending §

51.1-155.2

of the Code of Virginia shall apply to employees of political subdivisions unless the employer notifies the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System otherwise in writing on or before July 1, 1996.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in clause (i), substituted “§

15.2-406

” for “§ 15.1-115 or 15.1-704,” “§

15.2-804

” for “§ 15.1-731,” “§

15.2-509

” for “§ 15.1-595,” “§

15.2-609

” for “§ 15.1-631,” “§

15.2-702

” for “§ 15.1-674,” and substituted “Chapter 15 (§

15.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 15.2” for “§§ 15.1-795, 15.1-920, or § 15.1-926,” and in clause (ii), inserted “subdivisions A 2 and A 3 of,” and deleted “A 2” following “§

51.1-155

.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 343, in subsection A, in clause (i), deleted “or” following “§

15.2-702

,” and added “or county, city or town attorney pursuant to §

15.2-1542

” at the end, and substituted “fifty” for “fifty-five” at the end of clause (iii) in subsection A.

The 2000 amendment by c. 911 substituted “fifty” for “fifty-five” at the end of subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 537, in subsection A, substituted “or

15.2-702

, county administrator or city” for “or §

15.2-702

, city” in clause (i), and substituted “20 or more” for “twenty or more” at the beginning and “age 50” for “age fifty” at the end of clause (iii).

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 880, substituted “upon attaining age 60 if the member is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and upon attaining age 50 for any other member” for “upon attaining age 50” at the end of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356, in subsection A, substituted “The provisions of this section apply to any member” for “Members” in the first sentence and made related changes, inserted “Such member” at the beginning, substituted “50, provided, however, that if (a)” for “60 if” and added clauses (b) and (c), and substituted “age 60” for “age 50 for any other member” at the end of the second sentence.

§ 51.1-156.
Disability retirement.

Any member in service or within ninety days after termination of service who has not withdrawn his accumulated contributions as provided for in §

51.1-128

may retire for disability not compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.) upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective.

Any member in service or within ninety days after termination of service may retire for disability from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act upon written notification to the Board setting forth the date the retirement is to become effective.

If no compensation is finally awarded under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act, due to legal proceedings or otherwise resulting in settlement from the persons causing the disability, the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission shall determine whether the member’s disability is from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act.

The effective date of retirement shall be after the member’s last day of service but shall not be more than ninety days prior to the filing of the notice of retirement. The Board may waive the ninety-day requirement upon a showing of good cause.

After a medical examination of the member or after reviewing pertinent medical records, the Medical Board shall certify that (i) the member is and has been continuously since the effective date of retirement if prior to filing of the notification, mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, (ii) the incapacity is likely to be permanent, and (iii) the member should be retired. A member shall not be retired for disability for any condition which existed at the time of becoming a member unless medical evidence, convincing to the Board, supports the fact that the pre-existing condition has worsened substantially.

In the event the member is physically or mentally unable to submit written notification of his intention to retire, the member’s appointing authority may submit notification on his behalf.

Any member who has been on leave of absence without pay for a period exceeding twenty-four months shall not be entitled to retire under the provisions of this section. This subsection shall not apply to any member who is disabled while on leave without pay while performing active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States.

For good cause shown, the Board may waive the ninety-day notification periods set forth in subsections A and B. For purposes of this section, good cause shall exist and the Board shall waive such ninety-day notification periods if (i) the member would otherwise qualify for disability retirement but for failing to comply with the requirements of subsection A or B and (ii) the Medical Board, acting solely in its own discretion after reviewing objective medical evidence of the disability and its cause, certifies that: (a) the disability and its cause existed on the date the member’s employment was terminated, (b) the member had no knowledge of the existence of the disability and its cause at any time within ninety days after the date the member’s employment was terminated, and (c) the member could not, with reasonable inquiry, have ascertained the existence of the disability and its cause within ninety days after the date the member’s employment was terminated.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.56; 1960, c. 604; 1964, c. 186; 1966, c. 174; 1973, c. 523; 1982, c. 427; 1986, c. 474; 1988, c. 724; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 811; 1995, c. 307; 2009, c. 362.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

As to eligible state employees opting for a combination of age and/or creditable service retirement credits in lieu of transitional severance benefits, see §

2.2-3204

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 4-6.03 k, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection G of §

51.1-156

, any employee of a school division who completed a period of 24 months of leave of absence without pay during October 2013 and who had previously submitted an application for disability retirement to VRS in 2011 may submit an application for disability retirement under the provisions of §

51.1-156

. Such application shall be received by the Virginia Retirement System no later than October 1, 2014. This provision shall not be construed to grant relief in any case for which a court of competent jurisdiction has already rendered a decision, as contemplated by Article II, Section 14 of the Constitution of Virginia.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 362, added the last sentence in subsection G.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Pensions, § 2.

§ 51.1-157.
Disability retirement allowance.

Allowance payable on retirement. — Upon retirement for disability, a member who has five or more years of creditable service shall receive an annual retirement allowance during his lifetime and continued disability equal to 1.70 percent of his average final compensation multiplied by the smaller of (i) twice the amount of his creditable service or (ii) the amount of creditable service he would have completed at age 60 if he had remained in service to that age. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for a member who (a) is a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, or (b) does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, the allowance shall equal 1.65 percent of his average final compensation multiplied by the smaller of (1) twice the amount of his creditable service or (2) the amount of creditable service he would have completed at age 60 if he had remained in service to that age. If a member has already attained age 60, the amount of creditable service at his date of retirement shall be used.For retirements between October 1, 1994, and December 31, 1998, any employee or local officer who is a member or beneficiary of a retirement system administered by the Board shall receive an additional retirement allowance equal to three percent of the disability retirement allowance payable under this section; provided that, for purposes of this additional retirement allowance, the term employee shall include only those employees of political subdivisions that have adopted a resolution providing for such an allowance under subsection B of §

51.1-130

. Average final compensation attributable to service as Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, or member of the General Assembly shall not be included in computing this additional retirement allowance.

Workers’ compensation guarantee. — If a member retires for disability from a cause which is compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), the amount of the annual retirement allowance shall equal 66 and two-thirds percent of the member’s average final compensation if the member does not qualify for social security disability benefits under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of his retirement. If the member qualifies for social security disability benefits or has attained his normal retirement age under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of his retirement, the allowance payable from the retirement system shall equal 50 percent of his average final compensation. A member shall be entitled to the larger of the retirement allowance as determined under the provisions of subsection A or under the provisions of this subsection.

Reduction of allowance. — Any allowance payable to a member who retires for disability from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act shall be reduced by the amount of any payments under the provisions of the Act in effect on the date of retirement of the member and the excess of the allowance shall be paid to the member. When the time for compensation payments under the Act has elapsed, the member shall receive the full amount of the allowance payable during his lifetime and continued disability. If the member’s payments under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act are adjusted or terminated for refusal to work or to comply with the requirements of §

65.2-603

, his allowance shall be computed as if he were receiving the compensation to which he would otherwise be entitled.

Special retirement allowance guarantee. — Any member retired from a cause which is not compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act shall be guaranteed an annual retirement allowance during his lifetime and continued disability which equals 50 percent of the member’s average final compensation if the member does not qualify for social security disability benefits under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of his retirement. If the member qualifies for social security disability benefits or has attained his normal retirement age under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of retirement, the allowance payable from the retirement system shall equal 33 and one-third percent of his average final compensation.

Determination of retirement allowance. — For the purposes of this section, the retirement allowance shall be determined on the assumption that the retirement allowance is payable to the member alone and that no optional retirement allowance is elected.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.57; 1956, cc. 560, 652; 1960, c. 604; 1962, c. 245; 1964, c. 186; 1966, c. 174; 1970, c. 476; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 88; 1972, c. 568; 1973, c. 523; 1974, c. 353; 1976, c. 541; 1980, c. 722, § 51-111.57:1; 1982, c. 467; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832; 1993, c. 895; 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5; 1998, c. 674; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 53, 54.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1980, c. 722, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides:

“That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any member of the retirement system on March thirty-one, nineteen hundred eighty, or to any member whose benefit is based on service rendered prior to that date, except that the provision setting forth that salary received by members of the General Assembly pursuant to §§ 14.1-17.1 and 14.1-18 [see now §§ 30-19.11 and 30-19.12] shall be deemed creditable compensation and shall apply to all such members on the effective date of this act [July 1, 1980].”

Thus this section as in effect prior to the 1980 act remains in effect, but applies only to persons who were members of the retirement system on March 31, 1980, or whose benefit is based on service rendered prior to that date.

Acts 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5, cl. 3 provides: “That the state share of the cost of the additional retirement allowances payable under this act through amendments to §§

51.1-155

,

51.1-157

,

51.1-206

,

51.1-306

, and

51.1-308

shall be included initially in the 1996-98 budget bill submitted by the Governor.”

Acts 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commonwealth shall bear the cost of any increase in the employer contribution rate as a result of the additional retirement allowances payable under this act through amendments to §§

51.1-155

,

51.1-157

,

51.1-206

,

51.1-306

, and

51.1-308

for teachers recognized in the standards of quality and for Compensation Board approved salaries of local officers.”

Acts 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 5, cl. 5 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Planning and Budget shall report and make recommendations to the 1995 Session of the General Assembly regarding the state and local shares of the cost to fund the additional retirement allowances payable under this act through amendments to §§

51.1-155

,

51.1-157

,

51.1-206

,

51.1-306

, and

51.1-308

for teachers who are not recognized in the standards of quality and local officers who are not approved by the Compensation Board.”

Acts 1998, c. 674, cl. 2 provides: “That members who retire on or before December 31, 1998, shall receive a two percent increase in their retirement allowances.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

The 1998 amendment,

effective January 1, 1999, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “1.70” for “1.65,” and inserted “his” preceding “average final,” and in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “For retirements between” for “On and after,” and inserted “and December 31, 1998.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and added the present second sentence of the first paragraph of subsection A, and made minor stylistic changes throughout. Acts 2012, c. 823 added a clause (a) in subsection A and c. 701 made additional stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 53 and 54, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsections B and D, substituted “social security disability benefits” for “primary social security benefits” twice and inserted “or has attained his normal retirement age.”

§ 51.1-158.
Reduction of benefits for acceptance of lump-sum settlement under Workers’ Compensation Act.

The retirement allowance (i) of any member retiring for disability from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.) or (ii) of any surviving spouse, minor child, or parent, eligible to receive a benefit as a result of the death of a member from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act, who elects to receive a lump-sum settlement in lieu of periodic payments for disability or death compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act shall be adjusted by an amount determined by dividing the workers’ compensation benefit which such person would have received had the lump-sum settlement not been consummated, into the settlement actually accepted by the member, surviving spouse, child, or parent.

History.

1980, c. 645, § 51-111.59:1; 1982, c. 467; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-159.
Medical examinations of persons retired for disability.

Once each year following retirement, the Board may require a former member who retired for disability and who has not attained his normal retirement age to undergo a medical examination by the Medical Board or a physician or other health care professional designated by the Medical Board. If the former member refuses to submit to the required medical examination, his retirement allowance shall be discontinued until he complies. If he does not comply within six months of the date of the request, all of his rights to any further disability retirement allowance shall cease, subject to the provisions of §

51.1-160

.

If the Medical Board determines that a beneficiary is not disabled after reviewing the findings of any of the medical examinations provided for in this section, all rights to any further disability allowance shall cease, subject to the provisions of §

51.1-160

.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.61; 1984, c. 430; 1990, c. 832; 1998, c. 657; 2018, cc. 53, 305.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1984, c. 430, cl. 3 provides that the provisions of this section shall be construed to be applicable to persons who have retired prior to July 1, 1984, as well as those who will retire subsequent to that date.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection B, substituted “not” for “no longer.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 53 and 305 are identical, and substituted “other health care professional” for “physicians” in subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Pensions, § 2.

§ 51.1-160.
Cessation of disability retirement allowance.

If a beneficiary of a disability retirement allowance returns to service prior to his normal retirement date, his disability retirement allowance shall cease and he shall become a member of the retirement system and shall thereafter contribute. Any prior service on the basis of which his disability retirement allowance was computed shall be restored and, in addition, he shall be credited with all of his previous membership service including the period of disability retirement.

The balance of any contributions of the beneficiary in excess of the disability retirement allowance received by him shall be transferred from the retirement allowance account to the members’ contribution account.

If disability benefits are terminated as set forth in subsection B of §

51.1-159

, a beneficiary may (i) receive a refund of any accumulated contributions in excess of the disability retirement allowance received by him, in which case all rights to any further benefits payable under this chapter shall cease, (ii) return to service, in which case the provisions of subsections A and B of this section shall apply, or (iii) receive a deferred service allowance upon attaining the early retirement age if the total of the prior membership service and the period of disability retirement meet the creditable service requirements for deferred retirement for members terminating service.

The retirement system shall have no responsibility for the reemployment of a beneficiary in a covered position.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.63; 1960, c. 604; 1974, c. 353; 1984, c. 430; 1990, c. 832.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1984, c. 430, cl. 3 provides that the provisions of this section shall be construed to be applicable to persons who have retired prior to July 1, 1984, as well as those who will retire subsequent to that date.

§ 51.1-161.
Withdrawal of contributions before retirement.

Any member who has five or more years of creditable service, who ceases to be an employee, other than by death or retirement, may receive a refund of his accumulated contributions reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by him under any of the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) or the abolished system.
A. 1. Any member who has five or more years of creditable service, who ceases to be an employee, other than by death or retirement, may receive a refund of his accumulated contributions reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by him under any of the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) or the abolished system.

Any member who has less than five years of creditable service, who ceases to be an employee other than by death or involuntary separation due to causes other than job performance or misconduct, as determined by the employer in its sole discretion, shall have such refund reduced by that portion of his accumulated contributions that were paid by his employer on his behalf on or after July 1, 2010. Such reduction shall be transferred to the retirement allowance account of each employer who paid such contributions on a pro rata basis.

Accumulated contributions shall be refunded to a member upon retirement for disability only from a cause that is compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.) or to his designated beneficiary upon the death of the member from a cause that is compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act.

If a member becomes covered by an optional retirement plan established under §

51.1-126

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.5

, or

51.1-126.6

, the member may elect to have the balance of his accumulated contributions, as determined under subsection A, transferred directly to such optional retirement plan as a credit to his account in such plan. No portion of the transferred amount shall be available to the member until benefits under the optional retirement plan are otherwise available for distribution. An election to transfer the accumulated contributions to an optional retirement plan shall be treated as a withdrawal of the member’s accumulated contributions for purposes of §

51.1-128

, except that the member’s creditable service shall be taken into account for purposes of Chapter 14 (§

51.1-1400

et seq.).

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.58; 1960, c. 604; 1970, c. 476; 1986, c. 474; 1988, c. 809; 1990, c. 832; 2001, c. 691; 2006, c. 403; 2010, c. 758; 2012, c. 696.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 691 added subsection C.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 403, in subsection C, in the first sentence, inserted “51.1-126.5, or

51.1-126.6

” and substituted “Chapters 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) of this title” for “this chapter.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 758 inserted the subdivision A 1 designation, and therein substituted “Any member who has five or more years of creditable service, who ceases to be an employee” for “If a member has ceased to be an employee” and deleted “he” preceding “may receive”; and added subdivision A 2.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 696 substituted “Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.)” for “this chapter” in subdivision A 1; and in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “§

51.1-126

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.5

, or

51.1-126.6

” for “§§

51.1-126

,

51.1-126.5

, or

51.1-126.6

” and “the balance of his accumulated contributions, as determined under subsection A” for “his accumulated contributions, as reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by him under any of the provisions of Chapters 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) of this title or the abolished system” and added the exception at the end of the last sentence.

§ 51.1-162.
Death before retirement.

If a member dies before retirement, and if no benefits are payable under subsection B, the amount of his accumulated contributions shall be paid to the designated beneficiary or to a surviving relative according to the order of precedence set forth in this section. This amount shall be reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by the member under this chapter or the abolished system. Each member shall designate who is to receive a refund of accumulated contributions credited to his account in the event of the death of the member prior to retirement. The designation must be made in a manner prescribed by the Board.If no designation has been made, or the death of the designated person occurs prior to the death of the member and another designation has not been made, the proceeds shall be paid to the persons surviving at the death of the member in the following order of precedence:First, to the spouse of the member;Second, if no surviving spouse, to the children of the member and descendants of deceased children, per stirpes;Third, if none of the above, to the parents of the member;Fourth, if none of the above, to the duly appointed executor or administrator of the estate of the member;Fifth, if none of the above, to other next of kin of the member entitled under the laws of the domicile of the member at the time of his death.

To the extent required by § 401(a)(37) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans, if a member dies in service, including a member performing active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States, and if no benefits are payable under subsection C of this section, a retirement allowance shall be paid to the person or persons designated as provided in subsection A of this section if the person is the member’s (i) surviving spouse, (ii) minor child, or (iii) parent(s). If no designation has been made, or if the death of the designated person occurs prior to the death of the member and another designation has not been made, a retirement allowance shall be paid in the following order of precedence to the member’s (a) surviving spouse, (b) minor children, or (c) parent(s). The retirement allowance shall be paid to the first person qualifying in the orders of precedence set out in this subsection. If more than one minor child survives the deceased member, the allowance shall be divided among them in a manner determined by the Board. If more than one parent survives the deceased member, the allowance shall be divided among them in a manner determined by the Board. The retirement allowance shall be continued during the lifetime of the person or in the case of a minor child until the child dies or attains the age of majority, whichever occurs first. The retirement allowance shall equal the decreased retirement allowance that would have been payable under the joint and survivor option so that the same amount would be continued to such person after the member’s death. If the member dies prior to his fifty-fifth birthday, then, for purposes of this subsection, the member shall be presumed to be age 55 on his date of death. However, if the member dies in service prior to his sixtieth birthday and is (1) a person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, (2) a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, or (3) a member of the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, then, for purposes of this subsection, the member shall be presumed to be age 60 on his date of death. When determining the allowance that would have been payable to the member had the member retired on the date of his death, the provisions of subdivision A 4 of §

51.1-155

shall not apply. If the person elects in writing, the amount of the member’s accumulated contributions or lump sum payment shall be paid to him exclusively, in lieu of any other benefits under this section. This amount shall be reduced by the amount of any retirement allowance previously received by the member under this chapter.

If a member dies in service from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), a retirement allowance shall be paid to the member’s surviving spouse. If no compensation is finally awarded under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act due to legal proceedings or otherwise resulting in settlement from the persons causing such death, the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission shall determine whether the member’s death was from a cause compensable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act. If the member leaves no surviving spouse or the surviving spouse dies, any minor children of the deceased member shall be paid an allowance until the children die or attain the age of majority, whichever occurs first. If more than one minor child survives the deceased member, the allowance shall be divided in a manner determined by the Board. If the deceased member leaves neither surviving spouse nor minor child, the allowance, divided in a manner determined by the Board, shall be paid to the member’s parents during their lives.The retirement allowance payable hereunder to a qualifying survivor shall be the annual amount which when added to the compensation payable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act for the death of the member equals 50 percent of the member’s average final compensation if the survivor does not qualify for death benefits under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of the death of the member. If the survivor qualifies for death benefits under the provisions of the Social Security Act in effect on the date of the death of the member, the allowance payable from the retirement system when added to the compensation payable under the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Act shall equal thirty-three and one-third percent of the member’s average final compensation.Any beneficiary entitled to the entire amount of a retirement allowance under the provisions of this subsection as a result of the death of a member shall be entitled to waive his rights to the allowance by written notification to the Board within ninety days after the death of the member in order to make available a retirement allowance under the provisions of subsection B of this section.

History.

1960, c. 604, § 51-111.58:1; 1962, c. 438; 1966, c. 174; 1970, c. 476; 1972, c. 568; 1973, c. 523; 1974, c. 353; 1977, c. 620; 1986, c. 474; 1988, cc. 531, 540; 1990, c. 832; 1998, c. 407; 1999, cc. 111, 510; 2001, c. 683; 2002, c. 313; 2009, cc. 22, 362; 2011, c. 880; 2014, c. 356; 2015, c. 660.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 683, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to surviving spouses of members regardless of whether they are remarried before or after the effective date of this act. However, neither the Commonwealth, nor any of its political subdivisions, nor the Virginia Retirement System shall be liable for any retirement allowance, as provided under the amendments of this act, to such surviving spouses for any period prior to the effective date of this act.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in the introductory language, substituted “in a manner prescribed by” for “with”in two places; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “wholly dependent” twice, added the second sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “orders” for “order.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 111, in subsection B, deleted “wholly dependent” following clauses (iii) and (iv) in four places, and in next to the last sentence, inserted “or lump sum payment” following “member’s accumulated contributions”; in subsection C, in the last sentence inserted “divided in a manner determined by the Board,” deleted “wholly dependent upon him for support, divided in a manner determined by the Board,” and substituted “during their lives” for “during the lives of the parents.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 510 substituted “The retirement allowance shall equal the decreased retirement allowance that would have been payable under the joint and survivor option so that the same amount would be continued to such person after the member’s death. If the member dies prior to his fifty-fifth birthday, then, for purposes of this subsection, the member shall be presumed to be age fifty-five on his date of death” for “If a member dies prior to attaining his sixty-fifth birthday, the allowance shall equal one-half of the retirement allowance that would have been payable to the member had the member retired for early service retirement on the date of his death and elected to have his allowance payable under the joint and last-survivor option so that one-half thereof would be continued to such person after the member’s death. In the case of a member who had not attained his fifty-fifth birthday at his date of death, it shall be assumed that the member’s age at his date of death is fifty-five for the purpose of reducing the benefit on an actuarial equivalent basis. If a member dies after attaining his sixty-fifth birthday, the allowance shall equal the decreased retirement allowance that would have been payable to the member had the member retired at his normal retirement age on the date of his death and elected to have his allowance payable under the joint and last-survivor option so that the same amount would be continued to such person after the member’s death” in subsection B.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 683 deleted “or remarries” following “surviving spouse dies” in the third sentence of the first paragraph of subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 313, in subsection A, in the first paragraph added the first and second sentences and deleted the
last sentence, inserted “or the death of the designated person occurs prior to the death of the member and another designation has not been made” in the second paragraph, and deleted the last paragraph; and in subsection B, rewrote the first sentence and inserted the fourth sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 22, in the first paragraph of subsection A, substituted “in a manner prescribed by the Board” for “on a form prepared by the Board, signed and acknowledged by the member before a person authorized to take acknowledgments, and filed in a manner prescribed by the Board” in the last sentence and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The designation may be changed by the member by the written designation of some other person, signed, acknowledged, and filed in a manner prescribed by the Board”; and deleted “under seal and duly acknowledged” following “person elects in writing” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection B.

The 2009 amendment by c. 362 inserted “including a member who is on leave without pay while performing active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States” in the first sentence in subsection B.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 880, inserted the ninth sentence in subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 356 in subsection B substituted “prior to his sixtieth birthday and is (1) a person who” for “is a person who became” and “(2) a member who does not have at least 60 months of creditable service as of January 1, 2013, or (3) a member of the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

” for “and he dies prior to his sixtieth birthday” in the ninth sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 660 in subsection B, substituted “To the extent required by § 401(a)(37) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended or renumbered, and the regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans,” for “If” at the beginning and deleted “who is on leave without pay while” preceding “performing active duty” in the first sentence.

§ 51.1-163.
Death after retirement.

If a member dies after the effective date of retirement, any excess of his accumulated contributions as of the effective date of his retirement, over the total retirement allowances received by him, shall be paid in the same manner as provided in subsection A of §

51.1-162

, subsection A of §

51.1-207

, or subsection A of §

51.1-218

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member, unless the retirement allowance is then being paid in accordance with any of the optional benefits provided for in §

51.1-165

or §

51.1-165.01

. Accumulated contributions as of the effective date of retirement shall include all member contributions paid by the employer on behalf of the member on and after July 1, 1980, and all interest which would have accrued to these funds.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.59; 1960, c. 604; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 302; 1995, c. 307; 2001, cc. 679, 699.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 679 and 699 are identical, and in the first sentence inserted “subsection A of §

51.1-207

, or subsection A of §

51.1-218

, in accordance with the retirement plan covering such member,” and substituted “§

51.1-165

or §

51.1-165.01

” for “(i) §

51.1-165

A 1, A 2 or A 4 or (ii) § 51.1-165 A 3, if commencing prior to January 1, 1994.”

§ 51.1-164.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 269, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

51.1-164

, relating to disbursement by affidavit, was derived from Acts 1984, c. 430, § 51-111.58:2; 1986, c. 474; 1990, c. 832; 2004, c. 81.